Vermont statutes. Title 24 Municipal and County Government
Subchapter 3. Organization of Selectboard; Appointments; Powers

§ 871.
Organization of selectboard; appointments.

Forthwith after its election and qualification, the selectboard shall organize and elect a chair and, if so voted, a clerk from among its number, and file a certificate of such election for record in the office of the town clerk.

The selectboard shall appoint a tree warden, who need not be a resident of the municipality, and may appoint from among the registered voters the following officers who shall serve until their successors are appointed and qualified and shall certify the appointments to the town clerk who shall record the same:

three fence viewers;

a poundkeeper, for each pound; voting residence in the town need not be a qualification for this office provided appointee gives his or her consent to the appointment;

one or more inspectors of lumber, shingles, and wood;

one or more weighers of coal;

one town service officer; and

one grand juror.

After the selectboard appoints a tree warden, the selectboard shall certify the appointment to the Commissioner of Forests, Parks and Recreation. The certification shall include contact information for the appointed tree warden.

HISTORY:

Amended

1963, No. 74

, § 2;

2007, No. 121

(Adj. Sess.), § 18;

2015, No. 71

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

2017, No. 93

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

2019, No. 171

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Nov. 1, 2020.

§ 872.
Selectboard; general powers and duties.

The selectboard shall have the general supervision of the affairs of the town and shall cause to be performed all duties required of towns and town school districts not committed by law to the care of any particular officer.

The selectboard shall annually, on or before July 31, acknowledge receipt of and review the document made available by the Auditor of Accounts pursuant to

32 V.S.A. § 163(11)

regarding internal financial controls and which has been completed and provided to the selectboard by the treasurer pursuant to section 1571 of this title.

The selectboard may require any other officer or employee of the town who has the authority to receive or disburse town funds to complete and provide to the selectboard a copy of the document made available by the Auditor of Accounts pursuant to

32 V.S.A. § 163(11)

. The officer or employee shall complete and provide the document to the selectboard within 30 days of the selectboard’s requirement. The selectboard shall acknowledge receipt of and review the completed document within 30 days of receiving it from the officer or employee.

HISTORY:

Amended

2011, No. 155

(Adj. Sess.), § 26.

§ 873.
Repealed.
1967, No. 147, § 53(b), eff. Oct. 1, 1968.